District of Columbia statutes.
2-801

Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter:

(1)

“Inaugural Committee” means the committee appointed by the President-elect to be in charge of the Presidential inaugural ceremony and functions and activities connected with the ceremony; and

(2)

“inaugural period” means the period that includes the day on which the Presidential inaugural ceremony is held, the 5 calendar days immediately preceding that day, and the 4 calendar days immediately following that day.

Aug. 12, 1998, 112 Stat. 1263, Pub. L. 105-225, § 501
1981 Ed., § 1-1051.